Hawaii statutes.
§198D-8 Request to acquire rights for
public use of additional trails and accesses. The department may request
the legislature for appropriations to acquire rights to trails and accesses
which are closed to public use or which are necessary to effectuate the trail
and access program. [L 1988, c 236, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 273, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next